Nebraska, session 109, LB659.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB659 LB659
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 32-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-101 Sections 32-101 to 32-1552 and section 2 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Election Act.
Sec. 2. (1) An election commissioner or county clerk using a vote
counting device to count ballots shall conduct at least three independent
tests before counting begins to verify the accuracy of the counting
process, which includes the computerized program installed for counting
various ballots by vote counting device. The test shall be conducted by:
(a) The election commissioner or county clerk;
(b) The chief deputy election commissioner or a registered voter
with a different party affiliation than that of the election commissioner
or county clerk; and
(c) The person who installed the program in the vote counting device
or the person in charge of operating the device.
(2) Watchers may be appointed to be present and observe the tests.
Each political party shall be entitled to one watcher appointed and
supplied with credentials by the county central committee of such
political party. All other persons shall be excluded, except for
observers authorized by the election commissioner or county clerk.
Watchers and observers shall comply with the requirements for watchers
and observers under section 32-1525. Watchers and observers cannot be
excluded from the testing location unless the election commissioner or
county clerk provides an unobstructed view of the testing by use of
closed-circuit television or similar device.
(3) Prior to any statewide primary or general election, the election
commissioner or county clerk shall certify the date the testing was
completed to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall post
the certification on the Secretary of State's website.
Sec. 3. Section 32-1049, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-2-

LB659 LB659
2025 2025
32-1049 Any election commissioner or county clerk using a vote
counting device to count ballots in a centralized location shall:
(1) Provide for the proper sealing of the containers and the
security of the ballots when transported from each polling place to the
centralized location and when removed from their containers and delivered
to the personnel who operate the vote counting devices;
(2) Provide a process of counting which allows for the ballots of
each precinct to be placed in a sealed container and placed in a secure
location after the counting process has been completed;
(3) Provide for a method of overseeing the ballots that have been
overvoted or damaged which does not involve judging voter intent to
assure that these ballots have not been or will not be intentionally
mismarked;
(4) Provide for a procedure for counting write-in votes when such
votes and names of write-in candidates are to be counted and recorded;
(5) Provide the Secretary of State with the anticipated date by
which the testing required pursuant to section 2 of this act will be
completed; for at least three independent tests to be conducted before
counting begins to verify the accuracy of the counting process, which
includes the computerized program installed for counting various ballots
by vote counting devices, by (a) the election commissioner or county
clerk, (b) the chief deputy election commissioner or a registered voter
with a different party affiliation than that of the election commissioner
or county clerk, and (c) the person who installed the program in the vote
counting device or the person in charge of operating the device;
(6) Provide for storing and safeguarding the magnetic tapes or
computer chips of the vote counting devices for the required period of
time;
(7) Provide the appropriate security personnel or measures necessary
to safeguard the secrecy and security of the counting process;
(8) Develop a procedure for picking up and counting ballots during
-3-

LB659 LB659
2025 2025
election day at the discretion of the election commissioner or county
clerk. No report or tabulation of vote totals for such ballots shall be
produced or generated prior to one hour before the closing of the polls;
(9) Develop a procedure for picking up and transporting ballots from
a secure ballot drop-box to the office of the election commissioner or
county clerk; and
(10) Submit a written plan to the Secretary of State specifically
outlining the procedures that will be followed on election day to
implement this section. The plan shall be submitted no later than twenty-
five days before the election and shall be modified, as necessary, for
each primary, general, or special election.
Sec. 4. Original sections 32-101 and 32-1049, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-4-